dev/infreq-apertium-nn-nb.nn.dix
    <pardef n="tek/kjast__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kjast</l>
          <r>kjast<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kjest</l>
          <r>kjast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>st</l>
          <r>kjast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>test</l>
          <r>kjast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="t/emje__vblex_adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>amde</l>
          <r>emje<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>amd</l>
          <r>emje<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>amte</l>
          <r>emje<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>amt</l>
          <r>emje<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>emjast</l>
          <r>emje<s n="vblex"/><s n="pst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>emja</l>
          <r>emje<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>emje</l>
          <r>emje<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>emj</l>
          <r>emje<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>em</l>
          <r>emje<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>em</l>
          <r>emje<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dim/me__vblex_adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>de</l>
          <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>d</l>
          <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mar</l>
          <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mast</l>
          <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="pst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ma</l>
          <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ma</l>
          <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ma</l>
          <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ma</l>
          <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mer</l>
          <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>me</l>
          <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>me</l>
          <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
          <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="fork/omas__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jems</l>
          <r>omas<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>omas</l>
          <r>omas<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>omes</l>
          <r>omas<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oms</l>
          <r>omas<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sl/åst__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>åst</l>
          <r>åst<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>åst</l>
          <r>åst<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>åst</l>
          <r>åst<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>egest</l>
          <r>åst<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>egist</l>
          <r>åst<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ost</l>
          <r>åst<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bl/åse__vblex_adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>æs</l>
          <r>åse<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>åsast</l>
          <r>åse<s n="vblex"/><s n="pst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>åsa</l>
          <r>åse<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>åser</l>
          <r>åse<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>åse</l>
          <r>åse<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>åse</l>
          <r>åse<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>åsi</l>
          <r>åse<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>åste</l>
          <r>åse<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>åst</l>
          <r>åse<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ås</l>
          <r>åse<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>åse<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="st/ande__vblex_adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ade</l>
          <r>ande<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adi</l>
          <r>ande<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>andast</l>
          <r>ande<s n="vblex"/><s n="pst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anda</l>
          <r>ande<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ande</l>
          <r>ande<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>att</l>
          <r>ande<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>end</l>
          <r>ande<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>od</l>
          <r>ande<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>ande<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sk/jere__vblex_adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r>jere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jerast</l>
          <r>jere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jera</l>
          <r>jere<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jere</l>
          <r>jere<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jer</l>
          <r>jere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jer</l>
          <r>jere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ore</l>
          <r>jere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ori</l>
          <r>jere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="gremje"><i>gr</i><par n="t/emje__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="avskjere"><i>avsk</i><par n="sk/jere__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="lemje"><i>l</i><par n="t/emje__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="skjere"><i>sk</i><par n="sk/jere__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="kantskjere"><i>kantsk</i><par n="sk/jere__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="temje"><i>t</i><par n="t/emje__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="forskjere"><i>forsk</i><par n="sk/jere__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="forstande"><i>forst</i><par n="st/ande__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="stande"><i>st</i><par n="st/ande__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="omskjere"><i>omsk</i><par n="sk/jere__vblex_adj"/></e>
